Oklahoma, session 2026, SB266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 18b, as last


amended by Section 170, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 18b), is amended to read as follows:


Section 18b. A. The duties of the Attorney General as the


chief law officer of the state shall be:


1. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings, civil or criminal, in the Supreme Court and Court


of Criminal Appeals in which the state is interested as a party;



Req. No. 565 Page 1


2. To appear for the state and prosecute and defend all actions


and proceedings in any of the federal courts in which the state is


interested as a party;


3. To initiate or appear in any action in which the interests


of the state or the people of the state are at issue, or to appear


at the request of the Governor, the Legislature, or either branch


thereof, and prosecute and defend in any court or before any


commission, board or officers any cause or proceeding, civil or


criminal, in which the state may be a party or interested; and when


so appearing in any such cause or proceeding, the Attorney General


may, if the Attorney General deems it advisable and to the best


interest of the state, take and assume control of the prosecution or


defense of the state’s interest therein;


4. To consult with and advise district attorneys, when


requested by them, in all matters pertaining to the duties of their


offices, when the district attorneys shall furnish the Attorney


General with a written opinion supported by citation of authorities


upon the matter submitted;


5. To give an opinion in writing upon all questions of law


submitted to the Attorney General by the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or by any state officer, board, commission or


department, provided, that the Attorney General shall not furnish


opinions to any but district attorneys, the Legislature or either


branch thereof, or any other state official, board, commission or

Req. No. 565 Page 2


department, and to them only upon matters in which they are


officially interested;


6. At the request of the Governor, State Auditor and Inspector,


State Treasurer, or either branch of the Legislature, to prosecute


any official bond or any contract in which the state is interested,


upon a breach thereof, and to prosecute or defend for the state all


actions, civil or criminal, relating to any matter connected with


either of their Departments;


7. Whenever requested by any state officer, board or


commission, to prepare proper drafts for contracts, forms and other


writing which may be wanted for the use of the state;


8. To prepare drafts of bills and resolutions for individual


members of the Legislature upon their written request stating the


gist of the bill or resolution desired;


9. To enforce the proper application of monies appropriated by


the Legislature and to prosecute breaches of trust in the


administration of such funds;


10. To institute actions to recover state monies illegally


expended, to recover state property and to prevent the illegal use


of any state property, upon the request of the Governor or the


Legislature;


11. To pay into the State Treasury, immediately upon its


receipt, all monies received by the Attorney General belonging to



Req. No. 565 Page 3


the state. Provided, monies received on behalf of the Oklahoma


Municipal Power Authority shall be retained by the Authority;


12. To settle, compromise and dispose of an action in which the


Attorney General represents the interests of the state, so long as


the consideration negotiated for such settlement, compromise or


disposition is payable to the state or one of its agencies which is


a named party of the action and any monies, any property or other


item of value is paid first to the State Treasury;


13. To keep and file copies of all opinions, contracts, forms


and letters of the office, and to keep an index of all opinions,


contracts and forms according to subject and section of the law


construed or applied;


14. To keep a register or docket of all actions, demands and


investigations prosecuted, defended or conducted by the Attorney


General in behalf of the state. The register or docket shall give


the style of the case or investigation, where pending, court number,


office number, the gist of the matter, result and the names of the


assistants who handled the matter;


15. To keep a complete office file of all cases and


investigations handled by the Attorney General on behalf of the


state;


16. To report to the Legislature or either branch thereof


whenever requested upon any business relating to the duties of the


Office of the Attorney General’s office General;

Req. No. 565 Page 4


17. To institute civil actions against members of any state


board or commission for failure of such members to perform their


duties as prescribed by the statutes and the Constitution and to


prosecute members of any state board or commission for violation of


the criminal laws of this state where such violations have occurred


in connection with the performance of such members’ official duties;


18. To respond to any request for an opinion of the Office of


the Attorney General’s office General, submitted by a member of the


Legislature, regardless of subject matter, by written opinion


determinative of the law regarding such subject matter;


19. To convene multicounty grand juries in such manner and for


such purposes as provided by law; provided, such grand juries are


composed of citizens from each of the counties on a pro rata basis


by county;


20. To investigate any report by the State Auditor and


Inspector filed with the Attorney General pursuant to Section 223 of


this title and prosecute all actions, civil or criminal, relating to


such reports or any irregularities or derelictions in the management


of public funds or property which are violations of the laws of this


state;


21. To represent and protect the collective interests of all


utility consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before


the Corporation Commission or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;

Req. No. 565 Page 5


22. To represent and protect the collective interests of


insurance consumers of this state in rate-related proceedings before


the Insurance Commissioner or in any other state or federal judicial


or administrative proceeding;


23. To investigate and prosecute any criminal action relating


to insurance fraud, if in the opinion of the Attorney General a


criminal prosecution is warranted, or to refer such matters to the


appropriate district attorney;


24. To monitor and evaluate any action by the federal


government including, but not limited to, executive orders by the


President of the United States, rules or regulations promulgated by


an agency of the federal government or acts of Congress to determine


if such actions are in violation of the Tenth Amendment to the


Constitution of the United States;


25. To cross-deputize police officers of the police department


of any municipality or any officer deputized by the county sheriff


or a designee subject to an interlocal governmental agreement with


the Office of the Attorney General’s Office General in an effort to


combine city, county, and state law enforcement efforts and to


encourage cooperation between city, county, and state law


enforcement officials. Liability for the conduct of any municipal


police officer cross-deputized under the terms and conditions of an


interlocal governmental agreement or any officer deputized by the


county sheriff under the terms and conditions of an interlocal

Req. No. 565 Page 6


governmental agreement shall remain the responsibility of the


respective employer for that officer; and


26. To maintain data related to human trafficking and to assist


law enforcement, social service agencies, and victim services


programs in identifying and supporting victims of human trafficking.


B. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the


Attorney General to appear and defend or prosecute in any court any


cause or proceeding for or on behalf of the Oklahoma Tax Commission,


the Board of Managers of the State Insurance Fund, or the


Commissioners of the Land Office.


C. In all appeals from the Corporation Commission to the


Supreme Court of Oklahoma in which the state is a party, the


Attorney General shall have the right to designate counsel of the


Corporation Commission as the Attorney General’s legally appointed


representative in such appeals, and it shall be the duty of the


Corporation Commission counsel to act when so designated and to


consult and advise with the Attorney General regarding such appeals


prior to taking action therein.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 20i, as last


amended by Section 1, Chapter 212, O.S.L. 2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 20i), is amended to read as follows:


A. An agency or official of the executive branch may obtain


legal representation by one or more attorneys by means of one of the


following:

Req. No. 565 Page 7


1. Employing an attorney as such if otherwise authorized by


law;


2. Contracting with the Office of the Attorney General; or


3. If the Attorney General is unable to represent the agency,


or official due to a conflict of interest, or the Office of the


Attorney General is unable or lacks the personnel or expertise to


provide the specific representation required by such agency or


official, contracting with a private attorney or attorneys pursuant


to this section.


B. When entering into a contract for legal representation by


one or more private attorneys or law firms, an agency or official of


the executive branch shall select an attorney or attorneys or a law


firm or law firms from a list of attorneys and firms maintained by


the Attorney General. An agency may contract for legal


representation with one or more attorneys who are not on the list


only when there is no attorney or firm on the list capable of


providing the specific representation and only with the approval of


the Attorney General. The list shall include any attorney or firm


who desires to furnish services to an agency or official of the


executive branch and who has filed a schedule of fees for services


with and on a form approved by the Attorney General. The list of


attorneys and firms desiring to furnish services and a schedule of


fees for each attorney and firm shall be maintained and made


available to the public.

Req. No. 565 Page 8


C. An agency or official may agree to deviate from the schedule


of fees only with the approval of the Attorney General and if the


new schedule of fees would not violate the fee schedules set forth


in subsections D and E of this section.


D. An agency or official of the executive branch shall not


enter into a contingency fee contract that provides for the private


attorney or firm to receive an aggregate contingency fee that


exceeds:


1. Twenty-five percent (25%) of that portion of any amount


recovered that is Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or less;


2. Twenty percent (20%) of that portion of any amount recovered


that is more than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) but less than


or equal to Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00);


3. Fifteen percent (15%) of that portion of any amount


recovered that is more than Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00)


but less than or equal to Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00);


4. Ten percent (10%) of that portion of any amount recovered


that is more than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) but less


than or equal to Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00); and


5. Five percent (5%) of that portion of any amount recovered


that is more than Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).


E. Notwithstanding subsection D of this section, the total fee


payable to all retained private attorneys in any contingency fee


contract shall not exceed Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00),

Req. No. 565 Page 9


exclusive of any costs and expenses provided by the contract and


actually incurred by the retained private attorneys, regardless of


the number of actions or proceedings or the number of retained


private attorneys involved in the matter.


F. The Attorney General shall develop a standard clause for


inclusion in every contract for contingent fee attorney services


that shall be used in all cases, describing in detail what is


expected of both the contracted private attorney and the state


including, but not limited to, the requirements as provided in this


subsection. The state shall not enter into a contract for


contingency fee attorney services that does not incorporate such


requirements:


1. The government attorneys shall retain complete control over


the course and conduct of the case;


2. A government attorney with supervisory authority shall be


personally involved in oversight of the case;


3. The government attorneys shall retain veto power over any


decision made by outside counsel related to the case;


4. Any defendant in the case may contact the lead government


attorneys directly, without having to confer with outside counsel;


5. A government attorney with supervisory authority for the


case shall attend all settlement conferences; and





Req. No. 565 Page 10


6. Decisions regarding settlement of the case shall be reserved


exclusively to the discretion of the government attorneys and the


state.


G. Copies of any executed contingency fee contract with the


private attorney shall be posted on the Attorney General’s website


for public inspection within five (5) business days after the date


the contract is executed and shall remain posted on the website for


the duration of the contingency fee contract including any


extensions or amendments to the contract. Any payment of


contingency fees shall be posted on the Attorney General’s website


within fifteen (15) days after the payment of the contingency fees


to the private attorney or law firm and shall remain posted on the


website for at least three hundred sixty-five (365) days after the


payment is made.


H. Any private attorney or law firm under contract to provide


services to the state on a contingency fee basis shall from the


inception of the contract until at least four (4) years after the


contract expires or is terminated, maintain detailed current records


including documentation of all expenses, disbursements, charges,


credits, underlying receipts and invoices and other financial


transactions related to the attorney services. The private attorney


or law firm shall make all such records available for inspection and


copying upon request of the Attorney General. In addition, the


private attorney or law firm shall maintain detailed contemporaneous

Req. No. 565 Page 11


time records for the attorneys and paralegals working on the matter


in increments of no greater than one-tenth (1/10) of an hour and


shall promptly provide such records to the Attorney General upon


request.


I. Before entering into a contract for legal representation by


one or more private attorneys, an agency or official of the


executive branch shall furnish a copy of the proposed contract to


the Attorney General and notify the Attorney General of the


following:


1. The nature and scope of the representation including, but


not limited to, a description of any pending or anticipated


litigation or of the transaction requiring representation;


2. The reason or reasons for not obtaining the representation


from an attorney employed by the agency or official, if an attorney


is employed by the agency or official;


3. The reason or reasons for not obtaining the representation


from the Attorney General by contract;


4. The anticipated cost of the representation including the


following:


a. the basis for or method of calculation of the fee


including, when applicable, the hourly rate for each


attorney, paralegal, legal assistant, or other person


who will perform services under the contract, and



Req. No. 565 Page 12


b. the basis for and method of calculation of any


expenses which will be reimbursed by the agency or


official under the contract;


5. An estimate of the anticipated duration of the contract;


6. The past or present relationship, if any, between such


attorney, law firm or any partner or other principal in such law


firm and the state agency or state agent proposing to enter into the


contract;


7. If the contract contemplates that all or part of the fee is


contingent on the outcome of the legal proceeding, the reasons the


contingent fee arrangement is believed to be in the state’s interest


and any efforts undertaken to obtain private counsel on a


noncontingent fee basis; and


8. The justification for the determination that the selection


of a contract for legal representation by one or more private


attorneys or firms was made based on the ability of the private


attorney or firm to provide the most economical and most competent


service which furthers the best interest of the state.


J. After the approval of the contract by the Attorney General


for legal representation by one or more private attorneys or law


firms, the Attorney General shall make available to the public on


the Attorney General’s website the information required pursuant to


paragraphs 1 through 8 of subsection I of this section.



Req. No. 565 Page 13


K. 1. Before entering into a contract for legal representation


by one or more private attorneys or firms where the agency has


reason to believe that the case, transaction or matter will equal or


exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00) or after employment when


it becomes apparent that the case, transaction or matter will equal


or exceeds Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00), an agency or


official of the executive branch shall obtain the approval of the


Attorney General when the total cost including fees and expenses, of


all contracts relating to the same case, transaction, or matter will


equal or exceed Twenty Thousand Dollars ($20,000.00).


2. Before entering into a contract for legal representation by


one or more private attorneys or firms to initiate a legal action on


behalf of the state where the agency has reason to believe that the


total cost of the case, transaction or matter including fees and


expenses will equal or exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00),


an agency or official of the executive branch shall initiate a


request for proposal from at least three qualified private attorneys


or firms, when possible, engaged in providing such services. Notice


of the request for proposal shall be published on the Attorney


General’s website. The request for proposal shall solicit a


billable hourly rate, regardless of whether a contingency fee is


ultimately agreed upon, and shall specify the importance of price,


quality, ability and experience. The selection of a contract for


legal representation by one or more private attorneys or firms shall

Req. No. 565 Page 14


be made using the criteria established in the request for proposal


and shall be based on the response to the request which is the most


economical and provides the most competent service which furthers


the best interests of the state. Most economical and most competent


shall not be construed to mean the least expensive proposal.


3. Any amendment, modification or extension of a contract


which, had it been a part of the original contract would have


required approval by the Attorney General, shall also require


approval by the Attorney General.


L. After entering into a contract for legal representation by


one or more private attorneys or firms where the agency has reason


to believe that the case, transaction or matter will equal or exceed


One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), an agency or official of the


executive branch shall submit a copy of the contract to the


Legislative Oversight Committee legislative oversight committee


overseeing the operations of the Legislative Office of Fiscal


Transparency (LOFT) along with the following:


1. A description of the litigation or of the transaction


requiring representation;


2. The reason or reasons for not obtaining the representation


from an attorney employed by the agency or official;


3. The justification for selecting an attorney or firm


contracted to represent the state; and


4. An estimate of the anticipated duration of the contract.

Req. No. 565 Page 15


M. A settlement agreement shall not contemplate the ultimate


use and destination of recovered funds unless done in accordance


with paragraphs 11 and 12 of subsection B of Section 18b of this


title. Provided, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply


to settlement agreements entered into on behalf of the Oklahoma


Municipal Power Authority.


N. Within ten (10) days of an agency or official of the


executive branch entering into a settlement agreement where a


private attorney or firm was hired on a contingency fee contract and


the settlement was equal to or greater than One Million Dollars


($1,000,000.00), the agency or official of the executive branch


shall present the settlement agreement to the Legislative Oversight


Committee legislative oversight committee with oversight of the


operations of the Legislative Office of Fiscal Transparency (LOFT),


unless otherwise postponed by LOFT.


O. When an agency or official of the executive branch enters


into a contract for professional legal services pursuant to this


section, the agency shall also comply with the applicable provisions


of Section 85.41 of this title.


P. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the


Oklahoma Indigent Defense System created pursuant to Section 1355 et


seq. of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


Q. Upon request of an agency or official of the executive


branch, the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma

Req. No. 565 Page 16


State Senate and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of


Representatives may exempt a legal matter from the requirements of


this section if an exemption is deemed to be in the best interest of


the state. Such exemption shall be issued at their discretion, in


writing and by unanimous consent, and shall be submitted to LOFT.


R. By February 1 of each year, the Attorney General shall


submit a report electronically to the Governor, the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives,


the Chair of the Appropriations and Budget Committee of the House of


Representatives and the Chair of the Appropriations Committee of the


Senate, that describes the use of contracts with private attorneys


or law firms in the preceding fiscal year. At a minimum, the report


shall identify all new contracts entered into during the fiscal year


being reported and all previously executed contracts that remain


current during any part of the fiscal year. For each contract, the


report shall contain:


1. The name of the private attorney with whom the agency has


contracted including the name of the attorney’s law firm;


2. The nature and status of the legal matter;


3. The name of the parties to the legal matter;


4. The amount of any recovery;


5. The amount of any hourly rate;


6. The amount of any contingency fee paid, if applicable; and


7. The amount paid under the contract for the fiscal year.

Req. No. 565 Page 17


S. The provisions of subsections B through R of this section


shall not apply to any agency that invests funds on behalf of its


beneficiaries and, as part of its fiduciary duty, retains one or


more private attorneys or law firms to pursue individual, derivative


or class litigation concerning its investments or assets.


T. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any entity


exempted from Article I of the Administrative Procedures Act


pursuant to paragraphs 6 and 7 of subsection A of Section 250.4 of


Title 75 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-565 RD 12/30/2024 7:28:37 PM

























Req. No. 565 Page 18